Tennessee, session 114, HB2020.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 68-14-703(11)(D), is amended by
deleting the subdivision and substituting:
(D) "Food service establishment" does not include a church, temple, synagogue,
or other religious institution, or a civic, fraternal, or veteran's organization where food is
prepared, served, transported, or stored by volunteer personnel. However, the storage
of unopened, commercially canned food, packaged bulk food that is not potentially
hazardous, and dry goods does not apply for these purposes.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB2020
010440
- 1 -